Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 4. Vacancies in Nomination

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d Elections §§ 214, 215.

29 C.J.S. Elections §§ 182 to 184.

§ 22-5-401.
Vacancies in nomination for major parties; procedure for filing generally.

The vacancy in nomination which occurs if a major party candidate, between primary and general elections, dies, is disqualified to hold the office for which nominated, or files a withdrawal or rejection of nomination with the office where the candidate filed for nomination for election, shall be filled by certificate filed with the office which shall state:

The cause of vacancy and name of the former nominee;

The name, age, place of residence, post office address and qualifications of the successor nominee; and

The office and term for which nominated.

The certificate shall be prepared and filed by:

The state central committee of the political party of the former nominee for a partisan office to be voted for by the electors of the entire state;

The county central committee of the political party of the former nominee for a partisan office to be voted for by the electors of a county or a subdivision thereof, except as provided in paragraph (iv) of this subsection;

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 2; ch. 94, § 4.

For nominees for the state legislature, the state central committee of the political party of the former nominee for a partisan office shall:

Notify the precinct committeemen and committeewomen for that party for each precinct within the legislative district of the vacancy and arrange a meeting of those precinct committeemen and committeewomen at which a successor nominee shall be selected by them. The state central committee of each party may delegate the authority to call a meeting under this subparagraph;

Prepare and file the certificate required under subsection (a) of this section.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 204, § 2.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the vacancy in nomination created by failure of the qualified write-in nominee to accept nomination shall remain vacant.

A candidate may withdraw only by filing a written withdrawal in the filing office in which he filed his application for nomination. If a candidate withdraws after the ballots are finalized and approved for printing by a county clerk in any county where the candidate’s name will appear on the ballot, the county clerk shall not be required to remove the candidate’s name from the ballot, but shall post a notice at each polling place announcing that the named candidate is not the party’s nominee for the office designated.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-82; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1979, ch. 133, § 2; 1985, ch. 204, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 25, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1992, ch. 1, § 5; 1998, ch. 100, §§ 2, 5; 2001, ch. 116, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 4; ch. 94, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

As to filling vacancies in nomination for presidential elector, see §

22-19-105

.

As to filling vacancies in nomination for municipal office, see §

22-23-308

.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 42, § 2, repealed former (b)(iii), which read: “The county bar association for the office of justice of the peace.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 94, § 4, also repealed former (b)(iii), which read: “The county bar association for the office of justice of the peace.”

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Nomination by state central committee unauthorized. —

Statutes did not authorize state central committee to nominate candidate for office of secretary of state to fill unexpired term of one who died 26 days before general election date. State ex rel. Copenhaver v. Jack, 60 Wyo. 405, 153 P.2d 149,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1944).

Legislature has never recognized any power in political committees to make party nominations, except as delegated to it either by party convention or legislature. State ex rel. Copenhaver v. Jack, 60 Wyo. 405, 153 P.2d 149,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1944).

Nominee of different parties. —

Statute does not authorize printing of the name of one person as candidate for presidential elector in more than one place on the ticket, though nominated by two or more parties. State ex rel. Blydenburg v. Burdick, 6 Wyo. 448, 46 P. 854,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1896).

Where one of three persons nominated by the Democratic state convention as presidential elector declined and the vacancy was filled by nomination by the state committee of one who had been previously nominated by the People's Party, there was no authority for printing such person's name in more than 1 place on the ticket or for taking it out of the group of People's Party candidates, it being proper to place the words “Democrat and People's” after his name to show he was the nominee of both parties. State ex rel. Blydenburg v. Burdick, 6 Wyo. 448, 46 P. 854,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1896).

§ 22-5-402.
Procedure after ballots and labels printed.

If any major, minor or provisional party vacancy is filled after official ballots are finalized and approved for printing by a county clerk in any county where the candidate’s name will appear on the ballot, the county clerk shall not be required to add the new candidate’s name to the ballot.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-83; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, §§ 2, 5.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-5-403.
Vacancies in nomination for minor and provisional parties; withdrawal restricted.

Any vacancy in nomination which occurs if a minor or provisional party certified candidate dies, is disqualified to hold the office for which nominated or files a withdrawal or rejection of nomination may be filled by a certification from the state party chairman and state party secretary.

A candidate may withdraw only by filing a written withdrawal in the filing office in which he filed his application for nomination. If a candidate withdraws after the ballots are finalized and approved for printing by a county clerk in any county where the candidate’s name will appear on the ballot, the county clerk shall not be required to remove the candidate’s name from the ballot, but shall post a notice at each polling place announcing that the named candidate is not the party’s nominee for the office designated.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, §§ 2, 5.